Utah statutes.
62A-11-413.   Records and documentation -- Distribution or refund of collected income -- Allocation of payments among multiple notices to withhold.

(1)  The office shall keep adequate records to document and monitor all child support payments received under this part.

(2)  The office shall promptly distribute child support payments which it receives from a payor, to the obligee, unless those payments are owed to the department.

(3)  The office shall promptly refund any improperly withheld income to the obligor.

(4)  The office may allocate child support payments received from an obligor under this part among multiple notices to withhold which it has issued with regard to that obligor, in accordance with rules promulgated by the office to govern that procedure.

